Utah statutes.
53-2-110.   Energy emergency plan.

(1)  The division shall develop an energy emergency plan consistent with Title 63K, Chapter 2, Energy Emergency Powers of Governor.

(2)  In developing the energy emergency plan, the division shall coordinate with:

(a)  the Division of Public Utilities;

(b)  the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining;

(c)  the Division of Air Quality; and

(d)  the Department of Agriculture and Food with regard to weights and measures.

(3)  The energy emergency plan shall:

(a)  designate the division as the entity that will coordinate the implementation of the energy emergency plan;

(b)  provide for annual review of the energy emergency plan;

(c)  provide for cooperation with public utilities and other relevant private sector persons;

(d)  provide a procedure for maintaining a current list of contact persons required under the energy emergency plan; and

(e)  provide that the energy emergency plan may only be implemented if the governor declares:

(i)  a state of emergency as provided in Title 63K, Chapter 2, Disaster Response and Recovery; or

(ii)  a state of emergency related to energy as provided in Title 63K, Chapter 2, Energy Emergency Powers of Governor.

(4)  If an event requires the implementation of the energy emergency plan, the division shall report on that event and the implementation of the energy emergency plan to:

(a)  the governor; and

(b)  the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee.

(5)  If the energy emergency plan includes a procedure for obtaining information, the energy emergency plan shall incorporate reporting procedures that conform to existing requirements of federal, state, and local regulatory authorities wherever possible.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

